Privacy Policy
Last Updated: July 10, 2023.
PRIVACY POLICY
PerfectServe, Inc. (“
PerfectServe
”) and its subsidiaries, including but not limited to Lightning Bolt Solutions, Inc. (“
Lightning Bolt
”) and Telmediq Systems, Ltd. (“
Telmediq
”) (collectively the “
Company,
” “
we
” or “
us
”) realizes that privacy is an important issue, and we take your privacy seriously.
Please read the following to learn more about how we collect, use, and safeguard the information and data
            you may provide to us, or we otherwise collect in connection with offering our advanced clinical
            communications platform. We have also included product-specific details, which provide additional relevant
            information.
This Privacy Policy (“
Policy
”) is subject to modification and/or updates as set forth below under the caption “
Updates to this Policy.
”
Please click the following links to learn more about our Privacy Policy:
Applicability of this policy
How do we collect information from you?
What information does the company collect from you?
How is your information used and shared?
Additional disclosures for mobile app users
Additional disclosures for partner services
Protecting your personally identifiable information
Third party services, advertisers, and applications
Communications you may receive from us
International users – applicable law
Modifications and deletions to personal information, and other privacy information
Your data protection rights and how to exercise them
Children
Business transfer
Updates to this policy
Supplemental privacy terms applicable to certain regions
Contact Us
1. APPLICABILITY OF THIS POLICY
This Privacy Policy applies to information and data you may provide to us or we otherwise collect from you
            via our websites and applications (collectively, the “
Services
”), including but not limited to
www.perfectserve.com
,
www.lightning-bolt.com
, and
www.telmediq.com
website (collectively the “
PerfectServe Website(s)
”), the speech-enabled telephone voice interfaces, the “PerfectServe Practitioner”,
            “PerfectServe Care Team”, “PerfectServe Charge Capture”, “Telmediq –
            HIPAA Messenger”, and “Lightning Bolt Solutions Balanced Physician Scheduler” mobile
            applications, and any websites and applications that link to this Privacy Policy. For more information
            regarding how we use and share your data with respect to third-party partner tools, please see
Additional Disclosures for Partner Services
.
By using any of the Services, including accessing the website or downloading any of our mobile
                applications (collectively, the “Sites”), or voluntarily providing your information to us,
                you consent to the collection and use of all information as set forth in this Policy
. If you do not agree to the terms of this Policy, please do not provide us with any information and do not
            use the Services.This Privacy Policy applies only to information submitted or collected through the Services
            (other than as indicated below in this paragraph) and does not apply to any information that may be
            collected by the Company through any other means. This policy also does
not
apply to information about you collected by third party services, applications (such as through Google
            Docs), or websites or advertisements associated with, linked to or otherwise accessible from the Sites. In
            this regard, note that to the extent any credit card payment information (including the number, security
            code and expiration date) is submitted by you in connection with your use of the Sites or the Services, such
            information is not collected by the Company but rather is sent directly to a third-party payment processor
            (currently Authorize.net).
The information collected or received by such third parties (such as the third-party payment processor),
                is subject to their own privacy policies and under no circumstances is the Company responsible or liable
                for the third party’s compliance therewith
.
2. HOW DO WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM YOU?
We collect personally identifiable information (i) when you register to become a user of the Services
            through the Sites, (ii) when you access and use the Services, (iii) when you “opt in” for
            certain services or features of the Sites, such as electing to receive our newsletter and other emails, (iv)
            when you voluntarily provide us with information through emails or providing comments on our Blog and (iv)
            automatically as further described below.
We also receive the automatic and passive data (both personally identifiable and otherwise) from the
            computer, mobile phone or other device you use to access the Sites and the Services, and when you interact
            with the Services. In this regard, the Services use common automated information gathering tools such as
            logs files that record usage activity. We, and third-party providers of certain applications or
            functionality on our Sites (such as content sharing functionality from AddThis, Inc.) and analytics tools
            may also collect information through other monitoring technologies, in particular the following:
“Cookies.”
A cookie is a unique identifier sent to your computer by a Web server and stored on your
                computer’s hard drive. A cookie lets a computer server identify your computer. A cookie is what
                allows many sites to greet you upon every return with a personalized message even before you actively
                login. Our cookies do not include any personal information, but they do help us track which of our Web
                pages are visited and what services are most often used. Third party functionality included on the Site
                and any advertisements we may decide to show are likely to also contain cookies sent by the companies
                providing such functionality, advertising companies and/or advertisers (known as “third party
                cookies”). Most web browsers automatically accept cookies, but you may choose not to receive a
                cookie file by enabling your Web browser to refuse cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie.
                You may opt out of receiving cookies from third party advertising networks by going to the Network
                Advertising Initiatives cookie opt out page, which can be found at
                http://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp. Please be aware, however, that by refusing to
                accept cookies, you will be unable to access a significant portion of the Site and unable to use a
                significant portion of the Services.
“Clear gifs.”
Similarly, we, along with any third-party providers of analytics, functionality or advertising on
                our Sites may employ a software technology called clear gifs (a.k.a. web beacons/web bugs), that help us
                better manage content on our Sites and communications by informing us what content is effective. By way
                of example, our outgoing e-mail may include web beacons. Clear gifs/web beacons are tiny graphics with a
                unique identifier, similar in function to cookies, and are used to track the online movements of Web
                users. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on a user’s computer hard drive, clear gifs are
                embedded invisibly on Web pages and/or emails, and are about the size of the period at the end of this
                sentence. We do not tie the information gathered by clear gifs to our users’ personally
                identifiable information.
“Flash LSOs.”
When we post videos on our site, third parties may use local shared objects, also known as Flash
                cookies, to store your preferences for volume control, or to personalize certain video features. Flash
                cookies are different from browser cookies because of the amount of, type of, and how data is stored.
                Cookie management tools provided by your browser will not remove Flash cookies. To learn how to manage
                privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies click here:
http://www.macromedia.com/support/documentation/en/flashplayer/help/settings_manager.html#117118
We also use tracking tags provided by us by third parties to enable the tracking of activity and actions
                of visitors while they are on our Sites.
3. WHAT INFORMATION DOES THE COMPANY COLLECT FROM YOU?
Via the Sites or when you register for or otherwise interact with the Services, the Company collects from
            you: (i) certain non-personal technical and other information, (ii) certain personally identifiable
            information and (iii) information regarding your usage of the Services.
Non-Registered Visitors or Users of the Sites
– In general, if you visit or use the Sites without registering with the Company, you will be
            using the Sites anonymously; no personally identifiable information is collected (however, see below under
            the caption “
Additional Disclosure For Mobile App Users”
). In addition, we will collect certain non-personally identifiable information from non-registered users,
            as noted in “
All Users
” section below.
Registered Users
– At the time you become a registered user of the Services, you will providing us with the
            following registration-related information for yourself and/or others within your practice or organization:
            full name, address, office, home and mobile phone numbers, fax numbers, e-mail addresses, contact modalities
            and information on the persons or practices that referred you to the Company. In addition, registered users
            may elect to enter and disclose through use of the Services sensitive information, such as personal health
            information.
When registered users interact with the Sites and/or the Services, we will capture information on
            transactions and user activity including:
the number of transactions or interactions generated or which we process;
the time of a given transaction or interaction;
which departments or practices are using or receiving communications through the Services;
who is initiating the communications and to whom they are directed;
the contact modalities used;
misdirected interactions; and
time elapsed before messages are retrieved.
Depending on how you use the Services, we may collect the following additional personally identifiable
            information and data:
information about your use of Services features, how frequently you use them;
your responses to any offerings and advertisements presented on the Sites;
the specific Site content that you elect to share with third parties;
customer service information about you as a registered user; and
information that you publicly post on our blogs made available by the Sites.
All Users
– Regardless of whether you are a registered or non-registered user, when you use the Sites
            various types of information are collected automatically and passively through log files, cookies and the
            other tools noted above under the caption “
How We Collect Information From You
,” including your IP address (a number assigned to your computer when you use the Internet), the name
            of the web page from which you entered the Sites, type of browser or operating system you are using, the
            name of your Internet service provider, broad demographic data, your activity while using the Sites
            (including access times, duration of visit on each page, new and repeat visit information, exit page
            information, which links were clicked and in what quantity, as well as the aggregate number of links
            clicked, and other general usage activity), and data relating to malfunctions or problems occurring when you
            use your computer with the Sites. Such monitoring tools do not collect personally identifiable information
            such as name, address, telephone number, or e-mail address.
Tracking
: We do not engage in the collection of personally identifiable information about your online activities
            over time and across third party websites or online services. Accordingly, we do not currently process or
            comply with any web browser’s “do not track” signal or other mechanisms that provide
            consumers with the ability to exercise choice regarding the collection of personally identifiable
            information about your online activities over time and across third-party websites. However, we allow
            third-party companies (such as AddThis, Inc., as described below) to collect certain non-personally
            identifiable information when you visit our Sites which can be combined with non-personally identifiable
            information during your visits to other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services
            likely to be of greater interest to you. These companies typically use a cookie or a third-party web beacon
            to collect this information. To learn more about this behavioral advertising practice, you can visit
www.networkadvertising.org
.
As noted, the PerfectServe Websites includes functionality provided by AddThis, Inc. This functionality
            allows our users to seamlessly promote, create links, share digital content/materials, and copy and paste
            content from our Site. This content gets marked or “tagged” and the sharing of which, and
            related data, can then be tracked on a non-personally identifiable basis by AddThis as a result of being
            tagged. AddThis also deploys cookies when an end user visits a page on any site containing a “AddThis
            Application” (e.g., a sharing icon or widget) in order to allow them to collect information on
            categories of content shared by such users and categories of user interests. Such cookies will be placed and
            used in accordance with AddThis Privacy Policy located at www.addthis.com/privacy/privacy-policy and are not
            intended to identify or collect end user information on a personally identifiable basis. Such data may be
            used to provide advertising of interest to such users. You may opt-out of receiving cookies from AddThis,
            Inc., through AddThis, Inc.’s opt out page, which can be found at
http://sharethis.com/privacy/
.
Other Discretionary Contact With Us
– The Sites provide information on how to contact us electronically through the Sites and
            through email for purposes of sales inquiries, customer support, needs assessment and trials. Whenever you
            make any such contact, you will be providing us with your name and contact information, such as email
            address and phone number and business title, and hospital and/or physician group practice where you work or
            which you otherwise represent, and any information you choose to include in the text of your message.
If you make any comments on a blog or forum associated with our Sites, you should be aware that any
            personally identifiable information you submit there can be read, collected, or used by other users of these
            forums, and could be used to send you unsolicited messages. We are not responsible for the personally
            identifiable information you choose to submit in these blogs and forums.
4. HOW IS YOUR INFORMATION USED AND SHARED?
Our Use of Information
. We collect, retain, and use the information we collect via the Sites and Services for legitimate business
            purposes only: primarily to provide the Services which facilitate communications to and from your practice,
            patients and any hospitals who utilize the Services. This use will allow us to provide the Services as they
            exist today, but as we add innovative features in the future, the information we receive about you can be
            used in new ways.
We may use the information we collect about the transactions or interactions processed through the Services
            and how users interact with the Services to improve the Services, develop best practices for use of our
            Services and for clinical communications generally, to inform and educate the healthcare industry with
            regards to clinical communications, for articles and white papers.
However, we will not publish or distribute the content of or any personally-identifiable information
                related to any transactions or interactions processed through the Services, except for limited purposes
                as explained in the Our Sharing of Information section below.
In addition, we may use the information we receive about you:
to help keep the Sites safe and secure, and protect users’ rights or property;
to monitor your use of the Sites and Services, including to enforce any Site terms of use;
to measure or understand the effectiveness of our Sites and Services, and, if applicable the ads you and
                others see;
to share with third-party marketing partners for tailored advertising on our Sites and Services; and
to correspond with you regarding the Sites or matters relating to your use or potential use of the
                Services, or to inform you of developments in our Company or with our Services that we believe may be of
                interest to you.
We use cookies and other automated and passive tools (such as log files) to gather broad demographic
            information for internal marketing and demographic studies; to help identify you as a Site user or a
            registered user and to monitor and personalize your use of the Sites so as to improve your user experience;
            to assess overall activity on the Sites, including monitoring interest in particular features of the Sites;
            and for internal operations, including troubleshooting, diagnosing problems with servers, data analysis,
            testing, research and service improvement. For instance, we use your browser information to help us
            understand which browsers we need to test our content against. Likewise, we use page visit information to
            identify how well our messaging is resonating with our visitors. Further, the usage activity logs are a
            requirement to meet Federal HIPAA regulations.
Where our vendors, such as AddThis, provide additional functionality on the Sites, we use any information
            they may collect on our behalf consistent with the foregoing and, if applicable, as described in any
            interface for that functionality.
Mobile Apps
. The Company uses the information collected from your mobile device in a manner consistent with the
            foregoing. In addition, such information is used for the following three purposes. First, it is used by our
            support associates to support you if and when you have a problem with our Mobile Apps. Second, our product
            management team uses the information to make decisions about what devices and operating system versions to
            support. Finally, usage activity information is required to meet Federal HIPAA regulations.
While you are allowing us to use the information, we receive about you, you always own all of your
            information.
Our Sharing of Information
. Your trust is important to us, which is why we don’t share information we receive about you with
            others unless we have:
received your permission; or
given you notice, such as by telling you about it in this Policy; or
removed your name or any other personally identifying information from it.
We do not sell or rent your personally identifiable information to third parties for marketing purposes
            unless you use the third-party partner tools. For more information, please see
Additional Disclosures for Partner Services
.
We may share your personal information as follows:
When we believe it is appropriate to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal or suspected
                illegal activities; to protect and defend the rights, property, or safety of the Company, our users, or
                others; and in connection with the enforcement of terms which may govern our Site.
With business firms contracted to provide specific services to us, such as a credit card processing
                company or SMS providers, in a manner consistent with this Privacy Policy. In situations such as this,
                the third party servicing firm will be contractually obligated to use your personal data only for the
                purpose for which our relationship with the firm exists, and the firm will not have the right to share
                your data with other organizations or contact you outside the bounds of their contract with us. However,
                we cannot guarantee compliance by such third-party firms.
The contents of your online communications, as well as other information about you as a Site user, may
                be accessed and disclosed (i) in response to lawful governmental requests or legal process (for example,
                a court order, search warrant or subpoena) and (ii) in other circumstances in which we have a good faith
                belief that a crime has been or is being committed by you or another user or that an emergency exists
                that poses a threat to the safety of you or another person.
With respect to cookies, we share your information with third-party marketing and advertising partners
                to market our services on our Sites and other websites that you may visit.
As noted above under the caption “
What Information Does the Company Collect From You,
” information collected by AddThis through the Sites is used for online behavioral advertising
            purposes.
Legal basis for processing (EEA visitors only):
If you are a visitor from the European Economic Area (“EEA”), our legal basis for collecting and
            using the personal information described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the
            specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect personal information from you only where we need the personal information
            to initiate and agreement with you (e.g. to provide you with our Services), where the processing is in our
            legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and
            freedoms, or where we have your consent. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect
            personal information from you. If we ask you to provide personal information to comply with a legal
            requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you
            whether the provision of your personal information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible
            consequences if you do not provide your personal information).
Similarly, if we collect and use your personal information in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those
            of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time why we need to use your personal
            information. If we process personal information in reliance on your consent, you may withdraw your consent
            at any time.
If you have questions about, or need further information concerning, the legal basis on which the Company
            collects and uses your personal information, please contact us using the contact details provided under the
            “Contact Us” section below.
5. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURE FOR MOBILE APP USERS
The terms of this Policy generally apply to users of the “PerfectServe Practitioner”,
            “PerfectServe Care Team”, “PerfectServe Charge Capture”, “Telmediq –
            HIPAA Messenger”, and “Lightning Bolt Solutions Balanced Physician Scheduler” mobile
            applications, any additional mobile applications available from the Company at the time this Policy was last
            updated (the “
Mobile Apps
”). However, in addition, users of the Mobile Apps or those who merely download the Mobile Apps should
            note that the Mobile Apps collect and store types of personally identifiable information not usually
            obtained through typical web-based applications. These additional items of personally identifiable
            information include: device information (such as device OS version and device hardware), unique device
            identifiers (including device IP address), mobile phone number, geolocation data, as well as information
            regarding usage of the mobile device, including login times and usage activities log.
In addition, the Company has engaged the Pendo software development kit (“SDK”) to collect App
            ID on your device and product usage data which allows the Company to gather analytics and evaluate your
            behavior in using the Mobile Apps. Pendo
does not share your data with any 3rd party data broker or Ads service
. The data is collected solely to assist the Company in its understanding of the app usage and ability to
            target the relevant users with app-related messages.
6. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR PARTNER SERVICES
If you use certain third-party partner tools in our Mobile Apps, please note that we will share your
            publicly available National Provider Identifier with these third-party partners to provide the partner
            services and serve relevant advertising on your Company-provided Mobile App. To opt out of this sharing,
            follow the steps below:
https://support.perfectserve.com/hc/en-us/articles/17369097478669-Opt-out-of-data-sharing
https://support.lightning-bolt.com/hc/en-us/articles/17369179695373-Opt-out-of-Data-Sharing
7. PROTECTING YOUR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
Because security is important to both the Company and you, we maintain data handling and storage practices
            and procedures that are designed to maintain the integrity and confidentiality of the personally
            identifiable information (or “PII”) submitted to us, both during transmission and once we
            receive it. Industry standard internet security methods and technologies are used in an effort to prevent
            unauthorized access, maintain data accuracy, and ensure correct use of information. For example, where
            appropriate, when you enter sensitive information, such as personal health information, we encrypt that
            information using secure socket layer (“SSL”) technology. No method of transmission over the
            Internet or method of electronic storage is 100% secure, however. Therefore, while we strive to use
            commercially acceptable means to protect your personal information, we cannot guarantee its absolute
            security (for example, as a result of unauthorized acts by third parties that violate applicable law or the
            policies of the Sites and its service providers).
Data transmitted via the Sites (other than credit card payment information) is stored on servers which are
            owned or controlled by us and such data is store for as long as it is necessary to provide Services to you
            and others. Typically, information associated with your account will be kept until your account is deleted.
            For certain categories of data, we may also tell you from time to time about specific data retention
            practices. Where we are the data controller of personal information (for example, personal information
            relating to PerfectServe Website visitors, Attendees and individuals who register to use our Services), then
            we retain the personal information we collect where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so
            (for example, to provide you with our Services, to enable your participation in an event, and to comply with
            applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to
            process your personal information, we will either delete or aggregate it or, if this is not possible (for
            example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store
            your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you
            suspect unauthorized access to your information, it is your responsibility to contact the Company
            immediately.
Please be aware that data transmission is not always secure and we cannot warrant that information you
                transmit through the Sites is secure.
8. THIRD PARTY SERVICES, ADVERTISERS AND APPLICATIONS
The Sites now or in the future may reference or provide links to third party services, websites,
            applications or products, including through third party advertisements. As noted under the caption “
APPLICABILITY OF THIS POLICY,
” this Policy does not apply to information about you collected by third party services, websites,
            applications or advertisements associated with, linked to or otherwise accessible from the Sites. The
            Company does not control and is not responsible for such third-party services, applications, websites or
            advertisements, or for the privacy policies or information practices of such third parties or their
            services.
You should review the privacy policies applicable to such third-party services, applications, websites
                and advertisers.
9. COMMUNICATION YOU MAY RECEIVE FROM US
The Company uses voluntarily provided information to provide the Services that you request and give you
            better customer service. In addition, we use your contact information to send you from time to time
            announcements (via email or other electronic means) of new Services, updates, promotional information and
            newsletters. You may unsubscribe or “opt out” from these emails and other communications at any
            time by following the opt-out link provided in any email received or by contacting us via email at
connect@perfectserve.net
. Please allow ten (10) days to process such “opt-out” requests. Please note that even if you
            unsubscribe from promotional email messages, we may still need to contact you with important transactional
            information related to your account and your use of the Services. For example, even if you have unsubscribed
            from our email messages, we will still send you emails confirming your preferences needed to deliver our
            Services.
10. INTERNATIONAL USERS – APPLICABLE LAW
We collect, process, store, use, disclose, and dispose of personal information that you submit to us in
            accordance with applicable United States law. Please note that the personal information you submit to our
            Services will be transferred to the United States to be processed by us in order to provide this the
            Services to you or for such other purposes as set forth in this Policy. Any personal information or personal
            health information you submit to us is stored on servers in the United States and is not intended for use by
            anyone outside the US or its designated territories. If you are not a resident of the United States, you
            acknowledge and agree that we may collect, process, store, use, disclose and dispose your personal
            information, as discussed in this Privacy Policy, outside your resident jurisdiction, and it is your
            responsibility for ensuring whether such actions and the sharing of information with the Company through the
            Sites and use of the Services conforms to all local data protection laws applicable to you. In this regard,
            please be aware that United States law may offer different levels of protection for personal information
            than may be available in your country.
11. MODIFICATIONS AND DELETIONS TO PERSONAL INFORMATION, AND OTHER PRIVACY INFORMATION
We strive to maintain the accuracy of any personally identifiable information that may be collected from
            you, and will use our commercially reasonable efforts to respond promptly to update our database when you
            tell us the information in our database is not accurate. It is your responsibility to ensure that such
            information is accurate, complete and up-to-date. You may obtain from us, by e-mail the registration
            information in our records and/or files. Information will be updated as soon as reasonably practicable.
            Removed information may persist in backup copies for a reasonable period of time but will not be generally
            available.
Once you are no longer a user of our Services, your account is permanently deleted from the Sites. It
            typically takes about one month to delete an account, but some information may remain in backup copies and
            logs for up to ninety (90) days.
Certain information is needed to provide you with Services, so we only delete this information after you
            delete your account. Some of the things you do on the Sites are not stored in your account, like entering
            credit card information. Such information may only be deleted in accordance with the privacy policy of the
            applicable third party. See above under the caption “
Third Party Services, Advertisers and Applications.
”
Notice to End-Users
Our Services are intended for use by healthcare enterprises. Where our Services are made available to you
            through a customer of ours, that enterprise is the data controller of your personal information. Your data
            privacy questions and requests should initially be submitted to the customer in its capacity as your data
            controller. The Company is not responsible for our customers’ privacy or security practices which may
            be different than this Policy.
12. YOUR DATA PROTECTION RIGHTS AND HOW TO EXERCISE THEM
You have certain choices available to you when it comes to your personal information. Below is a summary of
            those choices, how to exercise them and any limitations.
Correcting, updating and removing your information:
An individual who seeks to exercise their data protection rights in respect of personal information stored
            or processed by us on behalf of a customer of ours within the Services (including to seek access to, or to
            correct, amend, delete, port or restrict processing of such personal information) should direct his/her
            query to our customer (the data controller). Upon receipt of a request from our customer for us to remove
            the personal information, we will respond to their request within thirty (30) days. We will retain personal
            information that we process and store on behalf of our customers for as long as needed to provide the
            Services to our customers.
Accessing and updating or deleting your information:
In cases where we act as the data controller of your personal information, we will provide you with
            information about whether we hold any of your personal information upon request. We will respond to such
            requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note, however, that we may need to retain certain information
            for record keeping purposes, to complete transactions or to comply with our legal obligations.
Deactivating your user profile:
If you no longer wish to use our Services, our customer may be able to deactivate your account. First,
            please contact customer with your request. If you are a customer and are unable to deactivate an end-user
            account through your administrator settings, please email
connect@perfectserve.net
. Please be aware that deactivating your account does not delete your information; your information remains
            visible to other Service users based on your past participation within the Services.
Request that we stop using your information:
You may request that your personal information no longer be accessed, stored, used and otherwise processed
            where you believe that the Company does not have the appropriate rights to do so. For example, if you
            believe a Services account was created for you without your permission or you are no longer an active user,
            you can request that we delete your account as provided in this Policy. Where you gave us consent to use
            your personal information for a limited purpose, you can contact us to withdraw that consent. You can also
            opt-out of our use of your personal information for marketing purposes by contacting us, as provided below.
            When you make such requests, we may need time to investigate and facilitate your request. Please note that
            an end-user of a customer should first contact that customer with a request to stop access, storage, use of
            personal information. If there is delay or dispute as to whether we have the right to continue using your
            personal information, we will restrict any further use of your personal information until the request is
            honored or the dispute is resolved, provided the customer does not object (where applicable).
Opt-out of communications:
We offer those who provide personal contact information a means to choose how we use the information
            provided. You may manage your receipt of marketing and non-transactional communications by sending a request
            to privacy. You may opt-out of receiving promotional communications from us by using this unsubscribe link
            within each email. Even after you opt-out from receiving promotional messages from us, if you are an agent
            of a customer, then you will continue to receive transactional messages from us regarding our Services. You
            can opt out of some notification messages in your account settings.
Other data protection rights:
If you wish to exercise any other data protection rights that are available to you under your local data
            protection laws (such as the right to data portability or to data restriction) then please send your request
            to
connect@perfectserve.net
and we will respond to your request in accordance with applicable data protection laws. You have the
            right to complain to your local data protection authority if you are unhappy with our data protection
            practices.
13. CHILDREN
The Services are intended for healthcare professionals. Accordingly, in compliance with the Children’s
            Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 6501-06 and 16 C.F.R. §§ 312.1-312.12, the
            Company will not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from anyone under the age of 13 or
            knowingly allow such persons to register. If you are under 13, please do not attempt to register for the
            Sites or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, mobile device number, or
            email address.
By using the Sites, you represent that you are not under 13 years of age.
14. BUSINESS TRANSFER
The Company may, in the future, sell or otherwise transfer some or all of its assets to a third party. Your
            information, including personally identifiable information and technical and usage information we obtain
            from you directly or automatically via the Sites or your use of the Services, may be disclosed to any
            potential or actual third-party purchasers of such assets and/or may be among those assets transferred.
15. UPDATES TO THIS POLICY
The Company reserves the right to modify this Policy at any time, so please review it frequently. If we make
            any changes to this Policy, we will change the “Last Updated” date above. If we decide to change
            our Policy in regards to how we utilize any personally identifiable information, we will post a notice or
            link to those changes on our homepage. If we make other material changes to this Policy or if we change our
            email practices, we will notify you here, by email, or by means of a notice on our home page. If you use our
            Sites or Services after we post these changes, this indicates your acceptance of them.
16. SUPPLEMENTAL PRIVACY TERMS APPLICABLE TO CERTAIN REGIONS
Canada:
Personal information (as the term is defined in the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents
            Act of Canada (“PIPEDA”)) will be collected, stored, used and/or processed by the Company in
            compliance with the Company’s obligations under PIPEDA.
The Company’s Supplemental Privacy Policy for California Residents:
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), which is effective as of January 1, 2020,
            regulates how we handle personal information of California residents and gives California residents certain
            rights with respect to their personal information.
The Company is both a “business” and a “service provider” under the CCPA. The
            following supplemental privacy policy applies to information we collect in our role as a business—this
            is when we interact directly with you. When we act as a service provider (for example, by providing our
            services to another company that you interact with), we follow the instructions of the business that engaged
            us with respect to how we process your personal information. If you would like more information about how
            your personal information is processed by other companies, including companies that engage us as a service
            provider, please contact those companies directly.
This supplemental privacy policy is effective as of January 1, 2020, shall apply only to residents of
            California, and may be subject to change. The general privacy policy shall continue to apply to the extent
            that it applies to you as a resident of California. If you are a resident of California, we are required to
            disclose certain uses and disclosures in a certain format, as well as to inform you of certain rights you
            may have. Any capitalized terms used in this supplemental privacy policy shall have the same meaning as in
            the general privacy policy.
Information We May Collect:
We may collect the following categories of information:
Identifiers
Demographic Information
Commercial Information
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Geolocation data
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
Professional or employment-related information
Inferences drawn from the above categories of information
For each category of information, we collect the information from a variety of sources, including directly
            from you, from your devices, from your social media profiles, and/or from third party providers. We collect
            the information to provide you with services, protect our customers and ourselves (including the services),
            and to improve the services..
Additional Disclosures:
Request for Information or Deletion.
California residents have the right to know whether we are processing your personal information, and in some
            instances, you have the right to request that we disclose to you the categories listed below for the
            preceding 12 months. We have the right to request verification of your identity for all requests for
            information. In responding to this right, we shall provide to you:
The categories of personal information we collect about you.
The categories of sources from which your personal information is collected.
The business or commercial purpose(s) for collecting, selling, sharing, or disclosing your personal
                information, and the categories of personal information disclosed for such purpose(s).
The categories of third parties with whom we share your personal information.
The categories of personal information we have sold, if any, about you and the categories of third
                parties to whom your personal information was sold, by category or categories of personal information
                for each third party to whom the personal information was sold.
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
In addition, you may have the right to request we delete your personal information.
Request for Correction.
California residents have the right to request the correction or rectification of inaccurate information in
            the resident’s personal information.
Request for Portable Data.
California residents have the right to receive, in certain circumstances, a portable format of their
            personal information that allows the data to be transmitted to another entity.
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
California residents have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal
            information.
We do not sell or rent your personally identifiable information to third parties for marketing purposes
            unless you use certain third-party partner tools. For more information, please see
Additional Disclosures for Partner Services
.
We may, however, place cookies to provide personalized or targeted advertising. You may opt out of receiving
            cookies from third party advertising networks by going to the Network Advertising Initiatives cookie opt out
            page, which can be found at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
.
We have disclosed the following categories of personal information for a business purpose in the twelve (12)
            months prior to this Policy’s last update:
Identifiers
Demographic Information
Commercial Information
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Geolocation data
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
Professional or employment-related information
Inferences drawn from any of the above information.
Limiting the Use of Sensitive Personal Information.
Residents of California have the right to direct us to use or disclose sensitive personal information only
            for providing goods or services, or as otherwise minimally permitted under applicable law. We do not use or
            disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose other than providing our goods and services to you,
            or as otherwise minimally permitted under applicable law.
Third Party Marketing.
If you are one of our customers, California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits you to request information
            regarding the disclosure of your personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct
            marketing purposes. To make such a request, please contact us using the contact details provided in the
            “Contact Information” section below.
Right to Equal Service & Price.
You have the right to receive equal service and price, even if you exercise a privacy right.
Verification Process for Exercising Rights.
To protect our consumers’ privacy, we verify privacy rights requests to ensure that only you (or your
            authorized agent) can exercise rights pertaining to your personal information. As part of our verification
            process, we may request you to submit additional information.
If you are an authorized agent wishing to exercise rights on behalf of a state resident, please contact us
            using the information at the bottom of this Privacy Policy and provide us with a copy of the
            consumer’s written authorization designating you as their agent. We may need to verify your identity
            and place of residence before completing your rights request.
Appeal Process.
If we do not decide to act in response to your request to exercise a right, we will provide a timely
            response detailing the reasons for not taking the action and, depending on your jurisdiction, any rights
            that you may have to appeal our decision.
To exercise these rights, please submit a request by emailing
connect@perfectserve.net
. Please be as specific as possible in relation to the personal information you wish to access. Once we
            receive your request, we will review it, determine whether we can verify your identity, and process the
            request accordingly. If we need additional information to verify your identity, we will let you know. We
            will respond to your request within forty-five (45) days of receipt, or notify you if we require additional
            time. If you would prefer, you may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf.
Contact:
If you have questions regarding this Policy or about the Company’s privacy practices, please contact
            us by email at
connect@perfectserve.net
, or at:
PerfectServe, Inc.
Attn: Cooper N. Gallimore, Esq., Corporate Attorney & Chief Privacy Officer
2160 Lakeside Centre Way, Suite 301
Knoxville, TN 37922, United States
16. CONTACT US
If you have questions or concerns regarding your privacy or security on our Sites or Services, feel free to
            contact us at
connect@perfectserve.net
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://sharethis.com/privacy/:
Opens in a new window
Opens an external website
Opens an external website in a new window
Close this dialog
This website stores data such as cookies to enable essential site functionality, as well as marketing, personalization, and analytics.
You may change your settings at any time or accept the default settings.
You may close this banner to continue with only essential cookies.
Privacy Policy
Storage Preferences
Marketing
Personalization
Analytics
Save
Accept All
Reject All
Privacy
To read our Privacy Policy in other languages please select below:
Francais
Español
Italiano
Português
Deutsche
日本語
Bahasa Indonesia
Melayu
Tagalog
हिन्दी
عربى
ShareThis is a division of
Predactiv, Inc.
, a data company. ShareThis takes privacy seriously. This Privacy Notice sets out what data we collect, how we collect it, why we process it, who we may share it with and, where the data we collect is personal data, your rights with respect to such personal data. ShareThis may change this Notice from time to time by updating this page. You should check this page from time to time to ensure that you are up to date with any changes.
ShareThis is committed to processing information in accordance with applicable laws (including where applicable the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) and as described in this Privacy Notice. For specific information about how ShareThis adheres to European, UK and Brazil data protection law and your rights as an EEA, UK, Swiss or Brazil data subject please click
here.
For information about how ShareThis adheres to applicable U.S. Privacy laws in States such as California, Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia, and Washington, please click
here
.
To access information for Publishers, please visit the Publisher Information page
here
.
To access Publisher Terms of Use, please click
here
.
Last Updated on: February 19, 2025
Opt-Out of Data Collection and Sharing
About ShareThis and Its Tools
ShareThis provides website operators (“Publishers”) with customizable social sharing tools, which makes sharing online content simple. Any user of a website can easily share anything on the web with their friends on social sites, such as Facebook, Twitter, Email, Digg, Reddit and more through using one of our tools on that website (“
ShareThis Icon
”).
ShareThis also collects pseudonymous data about internet users and how they interact with content, websites, and advertisements while online. Some of the data is collected via our tools such as the
ShareThis Icon
, and some is collected through third-party data providers via our parent company Predactiv. Certain data collected from each publisher related to the activity we observe on that publisher’s site is provided back to that Publisher. We also may license a larger data set (including the data collected via Predactiv) to advertisers, agencies, and other businesses (our “Customers”) to facilitate the delivery of relevant, targeted advertising and for a number of other reasons which are listed below.
We do this by using technology such as cookies and pixels (including the pixels and cookies of our customers) (“
ShareThis Publisher Applications
”) to gather information regarding the browsing and sharing activities of Internet users, both on websites that have the ShareThis Icon and similar tools installed on them. We also receive data from others who operate in the data analytics and advertising industries. We analyze and aggregate the data we collect to create groups of data (called audience segments) based on defined criteria.  For example, we segment into groups internet users who we believe have similar characteristics, interests, needs or behavioral patterns. Where we are able to infer that two or more browsers or devices are the same user or household, we may use that information to bolster our audience segments. We compile this data to provide analytics to our Publishers and license it to our Customers for a number of purposes as described below, including targeted advertising.
Targeted advertising has the aim of displaying advertising which is more likely to be of interest to internet users, based on analyses of their recent browsing and sharing activities and interactions with the website and adverts. It is also sometimes referred to as interest-based advertising or online behavioral advertising. For more information on this type of advertising,
click here
.
Contents
I. Data Collection and Use
II. The GDPR and Your Rights as a Swiss, EU, or UK Data Subject
III. The LGPD and Your Rights as a Brazil Data Subject
IV. The U.S. State Privacy Laws and Your Rights as a Data Subject
V. Data Sharing or Disclosure, Recipients of Your Data
VI. Commitments to Privacy Standards
VII. User Choices and Opt-out Rights
I.
Data Collection and Use
In order to offer our products and services, we collect and use data relating to the websites you visit to display personalized advertisements, provide analytics, and data modeling based on social sharing, by us or third parties. This data is pseudonymous personal data in that it may not be used directly by ShareThis to identify an actual person. This data does enable our systems to recognize your computer, device and/or browser over time. In many places, this pseudonymous data is considered personal data and/or personal information under applicable law.
We do not intentionally collect identifiable personal information such as your name, postal address, phone number, email address, credit card information, or anything else that can allow us or our customers to contact you directly as part of our products and services. We may collect identifiable personal information and even financial information such as payment or bank details if you are one of our Publishers or if you have a business relationship with ShareThis.
We have set out below the categories of data we process and why we process each category of data. Note: The categories of data we process under California law includes (a) Personal and Online Identifiers such as: IP address, mobile advertising IDs and similar pseudonymous UIDs and (b) Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement.
Usage Data and Profile Information
1.1 Usage Data
We collect information about how
Internet users
browse the Internet and interact with online content and advertisements through our ShareThis Icon, the ShareThis Publisher Applications and user interactions with advertisements on the Internet. We call this “Usage Data”.
Usage Data includes:
The unique IDs of the cookie(s) placed on your web browser (example: 37d387ca-f68a-11e5-b87d-0e58954c72b1) and/or a hashed version of an email address which help us recognize your browser or device over time.
Information about the user’s browser and device
User agent string
Webpages viewed (including the URL addresses of such pages and search parameters, which may include search terms and key words) and the previous web pages that referred the user to that webpage
Time when webpages are viewed
Search queries from which users are directed to a webpage
Navigation from page to page
Interactions with the webpage, including items clicked or selected and content highlighted or copied
Shares of content including what content is shared and where – for example, the relevant social media site (e.g., Twitter, Facebook)
Geographic information such as country, city, state, or postal code.
IP addresses
Device IDs
Although the Usage Data listed above is not used by ShareThis to directly identify an actual person, it is considered to be personal data in many places.
1.2 Profile Information
We receive information about the content of the websites that you visit and information about the audience of those websites to enable us to infer and create groups of users who have similar characteristics, interests, or behavioral patterns. We combine the Usage Data with data we receive from third party advertisers, analytics vendors and data partners to create categories of data that are helpful to advertisers seeking to deliver a more personalized advertising experience. For example, if a user regularly views or shares content about shopping for a car, our systems may infer that this user may be interested in purchasing an automobile.  This practice is sometimes referred to as interest-based advertising, and a segment titled “interested in automobile” is sometimes referred to as an audience segment or a “profile.” When we group this data into profiles, we refer to it as
“Profile Information”.
We can infer this Profile Information (by reference to browser identifiers, not actual names) using the information we obtain from third parties about the likely content and characteristics of the users and audiences of the websites which are visited. For example, visitors to a particular website may have an interest in cars while visitors to a different website may typically be within a certain age or income range. Where we are able to infer that two or more browsers or devices are the same user or household, we may use that information to bolster our Profile Information.
The characteristics by which we group users relate to age ranges, income ranges, education, gender, product or activity interests and family composition (e.g., how many children in the family), on the basis of information available about the typical audience of websites they visit and content viewed.
In certain cases where Publishers that we work with utilize the “Google Analytics By ShareThis WordPress” plug-in on their websites, ShareThis uses a Google Analytics feature currently known as Google Analytics Demographics, in order to better understand the audience demographics of those Publisher websites, and to provide insights about those demographics to the Publishers that own or operate those websites. To learn more about Google Analytics’ privacy practices, please click
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics by installing the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on, please click
here
, or you may also visit the
NAI consumer choice page
.
In the U.S., ShareThis creates modeled segments based off of demographic attributes where those attributes are aligned with the target audience of products marketed by pharmaceutical drug companies.
ShareThis does not create Profile Information based on topics we believe to be sensitive under applicable law, or based on visits to adult entertainment websites.
1.3 How we obtain Usage Data and Profile Information
We collect Usage Data when your device visits our website, uses or interacts with our services (including sharing content with the ShareThis Icon), when your device visits Publishers’ websites that use ShareThis Publisher Applications, and when your device views or clicks advertisements that we serve or are served on our behalf. We do so by using cookies placed on your browser (to the extent that cookies are not-restricted by the browser), pixel tags, and HTTP headers (or other communication protocols) and the use of hashed email address. We may also use probabilistic IDs generated via the user agent string and IP address when cookies are restricted by the browser.
Our use of Cookies and other Tracking Technologies
Web Environment:
(desktop, tablet, and smartphone browsers)
ShareThis places cookies containing a UID on the browsers of visitors to websites that use ShareThis Publisher Applications. The ShareThis Publisher Applications also may enable cookies to be placed by ShareThis partners and our Customers to enable the synchronization of unique identifiers between ShareThis and our third-party partners and Customers.
Cookies:
Small text files that contain a string of characters and uniquely identify a browser. Many browsers are initially set up to accept cookies. However, you may be able to change your browser settings to refuse or otherwise restrict cookies. Check your browser’s “Help” files to learn more about handling cookies on your browser.
Below is a description of the cookies placed by ShareThis.
Cookie
Duration
Purpose
_stid
1 year
ShareThis cookie ID.
_stidv
10 years
ShareThis cookie ID version.
wordpress_test_cookie
Session
ShareThis cookie, tests if we have access to cookies.
pubconsent
13 months
ShareThis cookie set to indicate user has made a declaration about GDPR data collection for IAB TCF v1 format.
st_optout
10 years
ShareThis cookie set to indicate that user has opted out from data collection.
_ga
2 years
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
_gat
1 day
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
_gid
1 day
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
visopt_s
3 months
VWO cookie to see the number of times the browser was closed and reopened.
_vis_opt_test_cookie
Session
VWO session cookie to see if the cookies are enabled on the browser of the user or not. Helps in tracking the number of browser sessions of a visitor.
_vwo_uuid_v2
1 year
VWO cookie calculates unique traffic on a website.
intercom-id-fe2c9dmj
10 months
Intercom: Anonymous visitor identifier cookie for site visitors.
intercom-session-fe2c9dmj
7 months
Intercom: Identifier for each unique browser session. Session cookie is refreshed on each successful logged-in ping, extending it to 1 week from that moment. User can access their conversations and have data communicated on logged out pages for 1 week, as long as the session isn’t intentionally terminated with ‘Intercom (’shutdown’), which usually happens on logout.
pxcelBcnLcy
Sessions
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to track latency on reporting beacon.
pxcelAcc3PC
1 day
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to check whether third party cookies are accepted by the browser. This is only set if there is no incoming cookie in the request.
pxcelPage_c010
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_B
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_C
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_D
1 year
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to track status of pixel rotation loading. ShareThis uses a different cookie for different groups of sites within the ShareThis network.
usprivacy
n/a
ShareThis reads if the usprivacy cookie is present in the publisher domain.
fpestid
13 months
Fpestid is a ShareThis cookie ID set in the domain of the website operator.
Pixel tags:
These are small blocks of code on a webpage which read and place cookies. When you visit a webpage, ShareThis’ pixel will see if your browser has a ShareThis cookie installed on it. If it doesn’t, the pixel will place the cookie. If the browser already has a ShareThis cookie, the pixel will “read” the cookie and will send us information such as the time you viewed a webpage, the type of browser used and your IP address. This is how we learn about your interests and enable our customers to deliver targeted advertising to you.
HTTP headers:
These are transmitted whenever a webpage is viewed, and contain technical information required to connect your browser to the webpage. This information may include information about the browser and the requested webpage. ShareThis collects this information.
Hashed emails:
Hashing an email is a cryptographic function. Hashing is a way of encrypting a piece of data, like an email address, into a hexadecimal string. By doing this, each email address becomes an unrecognizable jumble of numbers and letters. This technique doesn’t allow us to send you an email message or to identify who you are. However, it does allow us to recognize your browser or device in the same way that cookies help us to recognize your browser or device. ShareThis may obtain hashed emails from our advertising partners to help provide our products and services. We may also receive and hash emails you provide to our Publishers. For more information, and to better understand the choices available to you, please visit https://thenai.org/opt-out/ama-opt-out/.
Mobile Environments:
(Mobile applications)
To serve ads in mobile applications identifiers may be used, such as Google Advertising ID or Apple IDFA, depending on the operating system of your mobile device. The advertiser identifier does not identify you directly, but it enables advertisers and their technology partners to recognize your mobile device over time. Many of the mobile operating systems which provide these advertising IDs also provide the functionality to reset them and/or to record your opt-out choice. See your device manufacturer for more information or visit NAI Mobile opt-out page at
https://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice/
.
Connected TV Environments:
(Mobile applications)
To serve ads onto TV streaming devices and smart TVs, pseudonymous advertising identifiers may be used. The advertiser identifier does not identify you directly, but it enables advertisers and their technology partners to recognize your smart TV and/or streaming device over time. Many streaming devices and smart TVs that provide these advertising IDs also provide the functionality to reset them and/or to record your opt-out choice. See your device manufacturer for more information or visit the NAI SmartTV opt-out page at https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/.
Linking Environments:
(browsers and mobile apps used)
To serve you personalized advertisements and provide a seamless online experience, third party data partners that we work with may link your identifiers on the different environments you use. We may enable the linking of our Usage Data through cookie syncing. We do not use plain text information that may be used by ShareThis to identify you such as your name or address to operate the linking. Our data partners may use exact linking methods by leveraging the pseudonymous data collected through our technology such as advertising partner identifiers.
Probabilistic IDs
: Some browsers may block or otherwise restrict our ability to place cookies in the ShareThis domain. When this occurs, ShareThis may use a combination of user agent and IP address to help us recognize a browser or device over time.
You can manage cookies, change consents, or opt out of personalized ads using the mechanisms described in ‘
User Choices’
.
1.4 How we use Usage Data and Profile Information
We use Usage Data and Profile Information internally for the following business purposes:
To enable our tools to function;
Pursuant to our relationship with Google Analytics Demographics, to enable demographic reporting features we provide to our Publishers;
To link browsers and devices that we infer might belong to the same household;
To enable us to sync unique identifiers;
To enable ST to manage the security of our Website, tools, networks, and systems.
To comply with applicable laws.
We may also use Usage Data and Profile Information and/or audience segments and license such information to our Customers for the following business purposes including (where not prohibited under applicable law):
To enable the delivery of targeted advertising
To conduct market research and analytics in order to find meaningful patterns in the data that enables ShareThis to draw insights into how web Users generally behave. This may have specific application to companies seeking to better understand the characteristics of their target customer. It also may help hedge funds attempting understanding macro investment trends.
For data modeling in order to draw inferences. For example, to create lookalike audiences models.
To create modeled segments based off of demographic attributes.
To enhance security features or reduce fraud, including ad fraud,
To enhance addressability features that enable a company to recognize the same browser, device and/or user over time.
Our Customers who we share your data with may use this information to generate their own Profile Information. They may independently gain other demographical information about you through their own cookies or web beacons and combine it with the data we provide to them. While we ask our customers to avoid merging data received from ShareThis with identifiable personal data such as a clear email address (i.e., in violation of the
NAI Code of Conduct
), the use of cookies and pixel tags by these third-party advertisers, publishers, and ad networks are subject to their own privacy policies.  Please refer to the ‘Recipients of Your Data’ section of this Privacy Notice for more information about who we disclose your data to.
Children
ShareThis does not intentionally collect data from children and does not tailor any Profile Information or otherwise license data to enable targeting of children under 18 years of age. If you are a parent or guardian and believe we may be processing data of children you are responsible for, please see the section on User Choices and Rights, or contact us directly.
Emails from Users with ShareThis Icon
When you share to email with the ShareThis Icon, you choose how to connect to email from your device. We will only know what content you shared, and that you did so by means of email. We do not receive any information about the email itself, for example, your email address, the email address of the recipient or the content of your email. We are not responsible for the information shared by users via the ShareThis Publisher Applications.
Account Information
“
Account Information
” means the information which
Publishers
and
representatives of Publishers
provide when they register for an account with us and when they use their account.
Many of our services can be used without registering with us. However if you are a Publisher, or represent a Publisher, and want to use some of our enhanced features, you will need to register with us.
If you choose to register with us, you must be and you affirm that you are 18 years of age or older.
We do not sell or share registration information with third parties for direct marketing purposes.
Business contacts data
We may process your personal data if you are or your employer has a business relationship with us. For example, if you’re a Customer, a prospective Customer, a vendor/supplier of ours, or a business partner, we may process your data. The personal data we hold about you refers to your professional life (name, email address, billing address, office address, phone numbers, title, company you work for). We would have collected that information from exchanging emails or business cards, meeting at industry meetings or client sessions etc. We may process that data for a number of legitimate business purposes, including: a) to communicate with you within the context of our business relationship; b) to provide our products or services; c) for billing and invoicing purposes; and d) for sales, marketing and product promotional purposes ((e.g., uploading emails into LinkedIn and similar platforms to advertise new services to current and prospective Customers).
This data may also be processed for the purposes set out in the section ‘
General purposes which apply to all data.’
Employee and Job Applicants’ data
If you are an employee of ShareThis, or you apply for a role with ShareThis, in the US or in Europe, please refer to our HR Policy for information about how we process your data. These can be obtained from our HR department at
HR@ShareThis.com
.
Data Collected on ShareThis.com
This section sets out how we process data of
visitors of our corporate website
(our “Website”, ShareThis.com), apart from any
‘Usage Data and Profile Information’
and the
‘Account Information’
which relates only to Publishers who register with us.
When you visit our Website, you may choose to provide information to us voluntarily if you interact with ShareThis.com in certain ways, such as by applying for employment with ShareThis, or using one of our contact forms. This information is used only for the reasons for which it was collected, such as responding to your communication, and it is not shared with third parties other than trusted service providers who are contractually required to only use such data to fulfill the purpose for which it was collected.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to collect data automatically when you visit ShareThis.com and use that information to help administer the Website, to remember your preferences, to conduct website analytics and for security and fraud prevention purposes.
Where we enable third parties to collect pseudonymous information on ShareThis.com (e.g., using cookies and pixels), that information may be viewed as a sale of data by ShareThis under applicable in certain jurisdictions such as California. To address this, we provide you with a privacy notice when you visit the Website and the opportunity to opt-out of these third-party data collection practices on our Website. We encourage you to visit the applicable policies of those third parties or visit www.aboutads.info to learn more about interest-based advertising and to see your opt-out choices from other participating companies that may be collecting and using data on ShareThis.com.
General purposes which apply to all data
There are a number of “general” reasons that ShareThis may process data on our systems. Many of them are required by applicable law and/or to help us ensure that the Internet remains a safe space. Some of them enable us to promote and grow our business. If you’d like additional information, please email privacy@sharethis.com.
We may also process data for the following purposes: a) as required by applicable law; b) to cooperate with competent legal authorities such as data protection regulators, the police and the FBI; c) to enforce our terms and conditions, including by obtaining advice and conducting legal proceedings; d) to protect our operations, property and interests, and those of third parties; e) to sell and promote the sale of our business and/or assets.
Finally, ShareThis may transfer information to a successor entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change. If ShareThis is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of all or a portion of its assets, you will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our website of any change in ownership or uses of your information, as well as any choices you may have regarding your information.
II.
The GDPR and Your Rights as an EU, Swiss, or UK Data Subject
If you are located in the European Economic Area (EEA), the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) applies to our processing of personal data. If you are located in Switzerland, The Swiss Federal Data Protection Act applies to our processing of personal data. If you are located in the United Kingdom, then the Data Protection Act 2018 applies to our processing of personal data. These laws each grant those located respectively in the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK a set of clear privacy rights and imposes responsibilities on ShareThis as we process the personal data of data subjects located in those places. The ShareThis privacy policy outlines how and why ShareThis processes personal data. This section is designed to provide more information on how ShareThis adheres to the above data protection laws and your rights as a data subject. For purposes of this privacy policy, we’ll refer to the above data protection laws as “EEA Data Protection Laws” and data subjects located in the above places as “EEA Data Subjects.”
Definition of Personal Data
EEA Data Protection Laws define personal data broadly. As such, where Usage Data and/or Profile Information relates to an individual in the EEA, we treat it as personal data. Similarly, nearly all of the data collected from EEA Data Subjects in the context of our normal business operations is likely to be considered personal data. This includes: a) data collected via visits to ShareThis.com; b) data collected from Customers, Publishers and business partners; and c) data collected from employees and prospective employees.
Special Categories of Personal Data
ShareThis does not collect nor process any special categories of personal data with respect to EEA Data Subjects, and we do not create Profile Information of audience segments of such consumers based on special categories of personal data (i.e. data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, genetic data, biometric data, data concerning health, or data concerning a natural person’s sex life or sexual orientation).
Legal Basis for Processing
EEA Data Protection Laws requires entities seeking to process personal data to have a valid legal basis for doing so. The legal basis utilized by ShareThis include: a) consent (our primary legal basis with respect to our Processing of Usage Data and Profile Information); b) legitimate interest (i.e., where we believe that our need to process the data and/or the value we deliver by processing such data is not outweighed by the rights of the data subject); c) where necessary for the performance of a contract; and d) where processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations. We will endeavor to outline our legal basis for the most common types of processing conducted by ShareThis. For example, we may process
TC Strings
for the purpose of ensuring and being able to demonstrate that Users have consented to or not objected to the processing of their personal data in connection with targeted ads.
Cookie and Similar Tracking Technologies
– We endeavor to obtain consent for our placement of cookies, pixels and similar tracking technologies as required under the ePrivacy Directive as implemented throughout the EEA. As ShareThis does not have direct relationships with Internet users in many cases, we ask Publishers and other partners to obtain a consent on our behalf as described below.  Where we directly place cookies (e.g., via ShareThis.com) we directly obtain the consent from data subjects we’ve identified as being from the EEA or other place where consent is required.
Usage Data and Profile Information
– We obtain a consent for our placement of cookies as described above, and ShareThis also processes Usage Data and Profile Information with consent.
Website Data
– We collect personal data via ShareThis.com. Where that data is provided to ShareThis (e.g., via completing an online form), we consider it either Account Data and/or data collected pursuant to a business relationship which are described below. Where we place cookies via the Website, we use consent. Where data is collected automatically (e.g., log files containing IP addresses), we process such data via our legitimate interest and in order to maintain the Website and help us to a better job of personalizing the Website to the interests of visitors.
Account Data and Business Relationships
– We require some Publishers to setup an Account with ShareThis. Similarly, we maintain accounts containing personal data with most of the vendors who provide services to ShareThis, our Customers, our employees, and our business partners. If you are an employee of one of those entities, ShareThis may have your personal data including your name, your work email, or your work telephone number. For data subjects located in the EEA, Switzerland, or UK, we process this data under the legal basis of contractual necessity. In other words, we need to process this data in order to honor the terms of the contract between ShareThis and the Publisher, Customer, vendor, Etc. This includes maintaining an account and login credentials, billing and payment purposes, communicating with the other party, and fulfilling requests. Where we are seeking to market additional products and services to these entities, we will do so via legitimate interest unless applicable law dictates that we use consent (e.g., for email marketing).
General Purposes
– There are a number of instances where ShareThis processes personal data which are distinct from the descriptions provided above. For example:
Legal and Regulatory Compliance – Like most companies, ShareThis will process data in order to comply with law, cooperate with requests from competent legal authorities such as the police, and to pay taxes. The legal basis for this type of processing is necessary for ShareThis to meet our legal and regulatory obligations.
Enforcement of legal obligations – To enforce our terms and conditions, protect of our intellectual property and/or the rights of third parties, ShareThis processes personal data in these instances via our legitimate interest. This may include obtaining advice and conducting legal proceedings.
Sell and Promote our Business – ShareThis may choose to conduct, evaluate and/or promote the sale of our business via our legitimate interest.
Aggregated Data
– Where we aggregate data and remove digital identifiers (e.g., cookie IDs), we may use this data for internal research, marketing, and statistical analysis purposes.
Data Controller
ShareThis is generally a Controller of data with respect to the data processed as described above. Where the EEA Data Protection Laws apply to Usage Data and Profile Information and we share this data with our Customers, our Customers are independent controllers in relation to their processing of such data and they process it in accordance with their own privacy policies. ShareThis is also the controller of the data it collects via ShareThis.com.
Data Processors
ShareThis also has a number of agents and service providers who operate as processors of data on ShareThis’ behalf. These agents and service providers are only able to use the data as specifically directed by ShareThis and only to provide the services requested by us. They are also contractually obligated to process the data securely and under confidentiality obligations.
EEA Data Subject Rights
Where the EEA Data Protection Laws apply, such data subjects have certain rights, including: a) The right to be informed about the types of data being processed and the legal basis for processing; b) the right to access and see the data being processed; c) the right of rectification, to make corrections to data subject to processing; d) the right to erase data; e) the right to restrict processing of data; f) the right of data portability; g) the right to object to the processing of data and f) the right not to be subject to automated decision-making. Some of these rights apply only in certain circumstances and depend on the legal basis relied upon to process the data. As an example, the right to object applies to processing which is carried out because it is necessary for our legitimate interests and only if we cannot demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds which outweigh your rights, interests and freedoms. The same right does not apply to processing which is necessary for us to comply with our legal obligations or to perform a contract with you. These rights may extend to the personal data we place into cookies or similar tracking technologies.
Where processing is based on your consent, in accordance with the GDPR, the Swiss Federal Data Protection Act, and UK Data Protection Act (as applicable), you may withdraw that consent at any time, although any processing previously carried out will still be legal. In order to exercise your data subjects’ rights or if you have any questions about these rights, you can write to us at
privacy@sharethis.com
. We will endeavor to respond to any requests to exercise your rights within one month from when they are made, although this period may be extended in some cases in which case we will inform you before the expiration of the one-month period.
You also have the right to submit complaints to the supervisory authority in your jurisdiction. A list of supervisory authorities in the EEA can be found here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
.
How ShareThis interacts with our Publishers on GDPR, Swiss, and UK Data Protection compliance
If you are in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, you may be familiar with websites asking you to consent to the use of cookies and similar technologies. If you are in the UK, you may see similar consent notices which pertain to the UK Data Protection Act. Where the ShareThis Applications are used to process personal data from data subjects in places where a notice and/or consent is required, our Publishers are required to notify you about the use of the ShareThis Applications, mention ShareThis as a third party who processes your personal data and ask you to consent to such processing as well as the placement of cookies.
Cross-border transfers of EEA, Swiss, and UK personal data
We generally process data in the United States. When we share data, we provide data to companies globally. In each case, we have safeguards in place which allow those transfers to happen in a way that ensures data is handled in accordance with the applicable law.
When we transfer personal data outside the EEA, Switzerland, or UK, unless the recipient or location to which the data is transferred has been approved by the appropriate authorities as providing an adequate level of protection for personal data, we put in place measures to ensure that the transfer complies with the applicable data protection law and that the personal data which is transferred is appropriately safeguarded.
When we enter into business relationships which involves the transfer of  personal data of EEA Data Subjects to the United States, we put in place reasonable transfer mechanisms such as the EU standard contractual clauses with the recipient. More information about international data transfers under the GDPR can be found at
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection_en
.  If requested, we may make available a copy of such safeguards, as required by EAA Data Protection Laws.
Data Protection Officer and Representative
ShareThis has appointed a data protection officer to supervise our personal data processing-related activities, and to respond to requests as required.  Our DPO can be contacted as follows: Vincent Potier (ShareThis DPO):
dpo@sharethis.com
ShareThis’ representative in the UK is: ShareThis UK Limited of 10 John Street, London WC1N 2EB, UK.
ShareThis’ representative in the EU is: Verasafe and they may be reached at representative@sharethis.com.
III.
The LGPD and Your Rights as a Brazil Data Subject
If you are located in Brazil, then the Brazilian General Law for the Protection of Personal Data (LGPD) applies to our processing of personal data. The LGPD grants those located Brazil a set of clear privacy rights and imposes responsibilities on ShareThis as we process the personal data of data subjects located in Brazil. The ShareThis privacy policy outlines how and why ShareThis processes personal data. This section is designed to provide more information on how ShareThis adheres to the LGPD and your rights as a data subject located in Brazil.
Definition of Personal Data
The LGPD defines personal data broadly. As such, where Usage Data and/or Profile Information relates to an individual in Brazil, we treat it as personal data. Similarly, nearly all of the data collected from EEA, Swiss, and UK data subjects in the context of our normal business operations is likely to be considered personal data. This includes: a) data collected via visits to ShareThis.com; b) data collected from Customers, Publishers and business partners; and c) data collected from employees and prospective employees, as applicable.
Special Categories of Personal Data
ShareThis does not collect nor process any special categories of personal data with respect to data subjects in Brazil.
Legal Basis for Processing
The LGPD entities seeking to process personal data to have a valid legal basis for doing so. The legal basis utilized by ShareThis include: a) consent; b) legitimate interest (i.e., where we believe that our need to process the data and/or the value we deliver by processing such data is not outweighed by the rights of the data subject); c) where necessary for the performance of a contract; and d) where processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations.
Brazil and Data Subject Rights
Where the LGPD applies, such data subjects have certain rights, including: a) The right to be informed about the types of data being processed and the legal basis for processing; b) the right to access and see the data being processed; c) the right of rectification, to make corrections to data subject to processing; d) the right to erase data; e) the right to restrict processing of data; f) the right of data portability; g) the right to object to the processing of data and f) the right not to be subject to automated decision-making. Some of these rights apply only in certain circumstances and depend on the legal basis relied upon to process the data. If you are located in Brazil and have questions about how ShareThis implements these rights, please email us at privacy@sharethis.com.
IV.
The U.S. State Privacy Laws (e.g., CCPA) and Your Rights as a Data Subject
A number of U.S. states (e.g., California, Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada, Oregon, Virginia, Utah and Texas) have enacted laws that may provide additional privacy protections for data subjects and users located into those states, including:
the right to see what data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to know),
the right to correct the data we have about you, your computer or device, or to port that data to a different provider (subject to limitations),
the right to delete the data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to delete), and
the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of data about you, your computer or device to certain third parties (i.e., the right to opt-out from sales or sharing of your information) and the right to opt-out of profiling and/or targeted ads.
These U.S. state laws define personal information broadly. And as such, almost all of the information we collect is considered personal information under these laws. U.S. data subjects may send an email to
privacy@sharethis.com
to exercise those rights of visit data subject access page. California data subjects may also call us on our toll free CCPA privacy hotline at 1-800-272-1765. Some U.S. states provide you with the right to further appeal our determination to a consumer protection agency located in that state. For example:
Colorado – The Colorado Attorney General’s Office.
Maryland – Maryland Attorney General Consumer Protection Division.
Nebraska – Nebraska Attorney General’s Office.
New Hampshire – Data Privacy Unit of the Consumer Protection and Antitrust Bureau of the New Hampshire Attorney General’s Office.
New Jersey –  Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety of New Jersey.
Texas – For denied appeals, visit the Texas Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
Virginia – For denied appeals, visit the Virginia Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
We do not treat users that exercise any of the above rights differently or otherwise discriminate against users exercising privacy rights. However, we may not be able to honor a right if doing so would violate applicable law. ShareThis does not sell data collected via our Website or the data we use to operate our business. However, we transfer personal information collected via the ShareThis Publisher Applications to third parties and as such are considered to have sold data over the past twelve months under California law, including any of the Usage Data, Profile Information and/or audience segments.
We generally ask only for the minimum information necessary to help us process a subject access or deletion request and will keep information pertaining to your request for up to two years. If you are a customer of ShareThis with a login and password to the ShareThis platform, we ask that you first direct your request to the person or persons at your organization that administers the relationship with ShareThis. California data subjects may also call us on our toll free CCPA privacy hotline at 1-800-272-1765.
CCPA Metrics for 2023
Pursuant to CCPA Regulation 999.317(g), ShareThis informs you of the following metrics:
Total
Whole
Part
Denied
a. The number of CCPA requests to know that ShareThis received, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
0
0
0
0
b. The number of CCPA requests to delete that ShareThis received, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
17
17
0
0
c. The number of CCPA requests to opt-out that ShareThis received via our email form, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
9
9
0
0
d. The median number of days within which ShareThis substantively responded to requests to know, requests to delete and requests to opt-out
Total
Requests to know
0
Requests to delete
27
Requests to opt-out
Real Time
Total
e. The number of opt-out requests we received via the ShareThis opt-out page or industry opt-out pages worldwide in 2023 all of which resulted in the real-time placement of an opt-out cookie by ShareThis as described in this privacy policy.
7,524,354
V.
Data Sharing or Disclosure, Recipients of Your Data
We sell and/or share Usage Data, Profile Information and/or audience segments with the following types of businesses, and with the exception of Publishers, we view each of the below as our Customers:
Publishers – We provide analytics tools for Publishers based on the data collected via the ShareThis tools.
Advertisers and Retailers – companies seeking to better understand their customers so as to more effectively serve those customer’s needs
Advertising Agencies – companies that purchase advertising on behalf of other companies.
Advertising Technology Companies – companies that enable the delivery of advertising, mostly via digital channels, including demand side platforms, supply side platforms, advertising exchanges and ad servers.
Marketing Technology Companies – companies that enable the delivery of marketing messages via channels such as email and SMS.
Data Companies – companies that process data into profiles that enable other companies to market and advertise more effectively.
Professional Services Companies – Companies that provide high level strategy and analytic services.
Security or Fraud Prevention Vendors – Companies that help ensure the security and reliability of their customer’s data or infrastructure.
Investment Firms – Financial services companies and investment firms seeking to better understand how consumers use the Internet.
We share this information for the purposes listed in the section
‘Data Collection and Use
.’
Where the GDPR or similar privacy or data protection laws applies to Usage Data and Profile Information and we share this data with our Customers, our Customers are independent controllers in relation to their processing of such data and they process it in accordance with their own privacy policies.
Customers may share the data which they process with other third parties who are not mentioned in this Privacy Notice, in accordance with their own privacy policies.   As an example, they may use third party service providers to display advertising or other content on their behalf.
Please review some of our Customer’s privacy policies for more information:
LiveRamp:
https://liveramp.com/privacy/
AppNexus:
https://www.appnexus.com/platform-privacy-policy
Eyeota :
https://www.eyeota.com/privacy-policy
Lotame:
https://www.lotame.com/about-lotame/privacy/
Nielsen:
https://www.nielsen.com/legal/privacy-principles/nielsen-marketing-cloud-services-privacy-statement/
Retargetly:
https://retargetly.com/privacy-policy
1plusX:
https://www.1plusx.com/privacy-policy/
AptivIO:
https://aptiv.io/privacy-policy
Dunn & Bradstreet:
https://www.dnb.com/ca-en/utility-pages/privacy-policy.html
2. Other third-party agents and service providers
We share the data described in this Privacy Notice trusted agents with data storage and processing facilities such as Amazon Web Services who are required under contract to only process data according to our written instructions and we require them to use data only for the purposes of providing services to us and to implement security controls and to maintain the confidentiality of that information. Here are the categories of service providers utilized by ShareThis:
Cloud data storage providers such as Amazon Web Services;
Customer billing systems providers;
Email service providers offering tools to send emails on our behalf;
Website analytics providers such as Google analytics;
Customer relationship management software providers;
Vendors assisting us with legally required audits;
Third-party computer programmers helping ensure our systems are operating properly;
Job ticket support vendors helping us record issues and debug; and
Security vendors.
3. Data Retention
We have defined retention policies for different types of personal data. We only retain data for as long as necessary for the purpose for which we process it and only as long as it remains relevant, unless we need to retain it because we are required to do so by law, to defend and exercise claims, or for regulatory reasons.
3.1 Usage Data, Profile Information and Data Collected via ShareThis.com
We retain Usage Data and Profile Information for up to 13 months from the date of collection for targeted advertising, and for up to 36 months for insights and analytics. We also retain data collected via ShareThis.com for up to 36 months for analytics and to ensure that our website functions properly.
We may aggregate and anonymize data so that it can no longer be linked to a device or individual, therefore it ceases to be personal data, and we may retain this data for longer periods.
3.2 Account Information
We retain Account Information for as long as you have an active account with us. If you have not logged into any of our services with your username and password for a period of 14 consecutive months, we may deem your account as being inactive and delete your Account Information. This could result in the loss of data you may have saved and we do not accept liability for such deletion.
You always have the option to cancel your account with us at any time. Simply sign into the site and click on the My Account at the top of the page. Click on Edit Profile and then select Deactivate Account and follow the instructions. You may also request to have your Account Information removed by submitting a request to
privacy@sharethis.com
.
4. Data Security
The security of your information is a high priority to ShareThis. We have implemented industry-standard security measures.
While no transmission of data over the Internet is guaranteed to be completely secure, we strive to protect your data. It may be possible for third parties not under the control of ShareThis to unlawfully intercept or access transmissions of private communications. ShareThis cannot ensure or warrant the security of information you transmit to us.
VI.
Commitments to Privacy Standards
ShareThis promotes transparency and control for users as members of various self-regulatory programs. Some U.S. states provide you with the right to further appeal our determination to a consumer protection agency located in that state. For example:
Colorado – The Colorado Attorney General’s Office.
Maryland – Maryland Attorney General Consumer Protection Division.
Nebraska – Nebraska Attorney General’s Office.
New Hampshire – Data Privacy Unit of the Consumer Protection and Antitrust Bureau of the New Hampshire Attorney General’s Office.
New Jersey –  Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety of New Jersey.
Texas – For denied appeals, visit the Texas Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
Virginia – For denied appeals, visit the Virginia Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
ShareThis is a member of the following self-regulatory programs:
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI):
ShareThis is a member in good standing with the NAI. The NAI offers an online
web opt-out platform
to allow consumers to express their choices and provides general information related to privacy and
Interest Based Advertising
.
The Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA):
ShareThis adheres to the Digital Advertising Alliance Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising.  The
DAA opt-out platform
offers the consumer a choice page to opt out from advertising services, and general information related to privacy.
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA):
ShareThis adheres to the
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) principles
.  The
EDAA opt-out platform
offers consumers in the European Union a choice page to opt out from advertising services, and general information related to privacy.
VII.
User Choices and Opt-out Rights
If you do not want to receive advertisements based on Usage Data and Profile Information collected by ShareThis on your current browser, you can change and manage your preferences in relation to the collection and processing of Usage Data and Profile Information by clicking the ShareThis opt-out button available on this privacy policy. When data subjects opt-out, ShareThis will stop profiling, engaging in targeted advertising and/or selling or otherwise transferring data about their browser or device to third parties in accordance with applicable law.
If you do not want to receive ads based on Usage Data collected by ShareThis whatever device or browser used, you must opt-out from our services for each device and each internet web browser.
Opt-Out of Data Collection and Sharing
Click below to “Limit Ad-Tracking” function on mobile devices:
Instructions by Google for most Androids:
Google Play Help
Instructions by Apple for iOS version 6 and above:
Apple Support Center
Furthermore:
This process does not mean you will stop seeing advertisements, but that the advertisements you do see will not be influenced by the Usage Data collected and Profile Information used by ShareThis.
If you have any questions about your opt-out rights, you can write to us at
privacy@sharethis.com
.
Browser environment:
(desktop, tablet, and smartphone browsers)
When you change your consents or opt out, an opt-out cookie will be set on your browser. We must maintain the opt-out cookie on your browser in order to recognize you as having opted out from our service. The ShareThis opt-out cookie is like any other cookie; therefore, if you clear that cookie from your browser, use a different internet browser, or use a new computer to access the internet you must go through the process again.
You can also opt out by visiting the following links.
Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) Opt-Out Platform
Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Opt-Out Platform
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (“EDAA”) Opt-Out Platform
The
Ghostery browser extension
is also a good tool to see a list of all third-party cookies on each website you visit and allows you to selectively opt out.
Note:
The opt-out tools above are currently cookie-based i.e., they set a cookie on your browser which tells us that you have opted out. This means that the opt-out will only function if your browser is set to accept third party cookies. If your browser is set to automatically reject cookies or if you remove all cookies from your browser, the opt-out mechanism will not work since we would not see an opt-out cookie on your browser.
Also keep in mind that cookies are browser based, therefore if you change browsers, operating systems, or computers you would need to opt out again.
Mobile environment:
While the opt-out methods described above often work for mobile web browsing, they are cookie-based and are therefore less reliable in mobile “app” environments that may not accept interest-based advertising cookies.
Instead, you can typically opt out at the mobile platform level by the “limit ad tracking” function within the settings, as described below. Though we do not collect data from mobile apps for interest-based advertising, we or third parties we work with may use such data collected by others in delivering interest-based ads.
Most Android Users:
To use the “opt-out of interest-based advertising” option, follow the instructions provided by Google here:
Google Play Help
.
Please note that this is a device setting and will disable interest-based ads from all providers, and not just for ShareThis.
iOS users:
(version 6 and above)
To use the “Limit Ad-Tracking” option, follow the instructions provided by Apple here:
Apple Support Center
.
Please note that this is a device setting and will disable interest-based ads from all providers, and not just for ShareThis.
Do Not Track
/ Opt-out Preference Signals
:
You may also stop the collection of your Usage Data by using the do-not-track function, opt-out preference signals, or similar privacy controls of your browser. ShareThis recognizes these do-not-track signals from your browser. As required by law, or where we are able to ascertain that such signals are enacted by you and not set by default by your browser, we will consider them to be an indication that you have opted out.
Onward Transfer/Data Privacy Framework:
ShareThis is a division of Predactiv, Inc. As such, ShareThis is a U.S.-based covered entity of Predactiv and participates in and has certified its compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss U.S. DPF.  To read more about our compliance with DPF, please review Predactiv’s privacy policy
here
.
Contact Information
ShareThis, Inc.
3000 El Camino Real
Building 4, Suite 200
Palo Alto, CA 94306, USA
privacy@sharethis.com
We have appointed a data protection officer to supervise our personal data
processing-related activities, and to respond to requests as required. Our DPO can be contacted as follows:
Vincent Potier (ShareThis DPO): dpo@sharethis.com
ShareThis’ representative in the UK is: ShareThis UK Limited of 10 John Street, London
WC1N 2EB, UK
VeraSafe has been appointed as ShareThis’s representative in the European Union for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation of the European Union. If you are in the European Economic Area, VeraSafe can be contacted in addition to representative@sharethis.com, only on matters related to the processing of personal data. To make such an inquiry, please contact VeraSafe using this contact form: https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative or via telephone at: +420 228 881 031.
Opt-out confirmed
Now, we can’t sell your data.
Close
Back to contents
EN
ES
DE
FR
IT
ZH-TW
PT
JA
132k
Shares
Share
Tweet
Pin
Email
Share
Share